Massachusetts, session 194th, S3045.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17W the following section:-
Section 17X. (a) The commission shall ensure that the rate of payment for services
provided to an active or retired employee of the commonwealth who is insured under the group
insurance commission that are rendered by a certified nurse-midwife authorized to engage in the
practice of nurse-midwifery by the board of registration in nursing pursuant to section 80C of
chapter 112 that is within the scope of the certified nurse-midwife's authorization to practice
shall be no less than the payment rate for the same service if performed by a physician,
regardless of the site of services, or length of stay.
(b) The commission shall ensure that the rate of payment for services provided to an
active or retired employee of the commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance that
are rendered by a licensed certified professional midwife authorized to engage in the practice of
midwifery by the board of registration in midwifery pursuant to section 110 of chapter 13 that is
of 6

within the scope of the licensed certified professional midwife's authorization to practice shall be
no less than the payment rate for the same service if performed by a physician, regardless of the
site of services, or length of stay.
SECTION 2. Paragraph two of section 10A of chapter 118E of the General Laws,
as appearing in chapter 186 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting after the word
“division”, in line 21, the following words:- and its contracted health insurers, health plans,
health maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party
administrators under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization, accountable care
organization or primary care clinician plan.
SECTION 3. Section 10A of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as inserted by
section 40 of chapter 186 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the third
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization, accountable care organization or primary care
clinician plan shall provide coverage for midwifery services, including prenatal care, childbirth
and postpartum care, provided by a licensed certified professional midwife regardless of the site
of services. The payment rate for a service provided by a licensed certified professional midwife
that is within the scope of the licensed certified professional midwife’s authorization to practice
shall be no less than the payment rate for the same service if performed by a physician,
regardless of the site of services, or length of stay.
of 6

SECTION 4. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47YY the following section:-
Section 47ZZ. (a) A policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide that the rate of payment
for services rendered by a certified nurse-midwife authorized to engage in the practice of nurse-
midwifery by the board of registration in nursing pursuant to section 80C of chapter 112 that is
within the scope of the certified nurse-midwife's authorization to practice shall be no less than
the payment rate for the same service if performed by a physician, regardless of the site of
services, or length of stay.
(b) A policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide that the rate of payment for services
rendered by a licensed certified professional midwife authorized to engage in the practice of
midwifery by the board of registration in midwifery pursuant to section 110 of chapter 13 that is
within the scope of the licensed certified professional midwife's authorization to practice shall be
no less than the payment rate for the same service if performed by a physician, regardless of the
site of services, or length of stay.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting
after section 8ZZ the following section:-
Section 8AAA. (a) A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an
individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without
the commonwealth shall provide that the rate of payment for services rendered by a certified
nurse-midwife authorized to engage in the practice of nurse-midwifery by the board of
of 6

registration in nursing pursuant to section 80C of chapter 112 that is within the scope of the
certified nurse-midwife's authorization to practice shall be no less than the payment rate for the
same service if performed by a physician, regardless of the site of services.
(b) A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth
shall provide that the rate of payment for services rendered by a licensed certified professional
midwife authorized to engage in the practice of midwifery by the board of registration in
midwifery pursuant to section 110 of chapter 13 that is within the scope of the licensed certified
professional midwife's authorization to practice shall be no less than the payment rate for the
same service if performed by a physician, regardless of the site of services, or length of stay.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4ZZ the following section:-
Section 4AAA. (a) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical
service agreement that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide
that the rate of payment for services rendered by a certified nurse-midwife authorized to engage
in the practice of nurse-midwifery by the board of registration in nursing pursuant to section 80C
of chapter 112 that is within the scope of the certified nurse-midwife's authorization to practice
shall be no less than the payment rate for the same service if performed by a physician,
regardless of the site of services.
(b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide that the rate of
payment for services rendered by a licensed certified professional midwife authorized to engage
of 6

in the practice of midwifery by the board of registration in midwifery pursuant to section 110 of
chapter 13 that is within the scope of the licensed certified professional midwife's authorization
to practice shall be no less than the payment rate for the same service if performed by a
physician, regardless of the site of services, or length of stay.
SECTION 7. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4RR the following section:-
Section 4SS. (a) Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or
renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide that the rate of payment for services
rendered by a certified nurse-midwife authorized to engage in the practice of nurse-midwifery by
the board of registration in nursing pursuant to section 80C of chapter 112 that is within the
scope of the certified nurse-midwife's authorization to practice shall be no less than the payment
rate for the same service if performed by a physician, regardless of the site of services, or length
of stay.
(b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide that the rate of
payment for services rendered by a licensed certified professional midwife authorized to engage
in the practice of midwifery by the board of registration in midwifery pursuant to section 110 of
chapter 13 that is within the scope of the licensed certified professional midwife's authorization
to practice shall be no less than the payment rate for the same service if performed by a
physician, regardless of the site of services, or length of stay.
SECTION 8. No later than 12 months after the effective date of this act, the
100 department of public health shall establish licensing requirements, plan review checklists and
of 6

101 facility guidelines specific for birth centers that reflect the particular needs of birth centers and
102 low-risk childbearing people. The requirements and guidelines shall be developed in consultation
103 with operators of birth centers in the commonwealth, people involved with the development of
104 prospective birth centers in the commonwealth, and groups concerned with improving birth
105 outcomes, midwifery and birth centers, including, but not limited to, the American College of
106 Nurse-Midwives, the National Association of Certified Professional Midwives, the American
107 Association of Birth Centers, and the Commission for the Accreditation of Birth Centers.
of 6